Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Chapter 125. Municipal Employees’ Retirement System of Vermont
§ 5066a.
Alternate payee; domestic relations orders.

As used in this section:

“Alternate payee” means any individual who is recognized by a domestic relations order as having a right to receive all, or a portion of, another individual’s payment rights in the System.

“Domestic relations order” means a judgment, decree, or order of the Family Division of the Superior Court issued pursuant to 4 V.S.A. chapter 10, concerning marital property rights that includes a transfer of all, or a portion of, a member’s or beneficiary’s payment rights in the System to an alternate payee. It also means a judgment, decree, or order from a court of competent jurisdiction in another state, concerning marital property rights that includes a transfer of all, or a portion of, a member’s or beneficiary’s payment rights in the System to an alternate payee. Domestic relations orders shall conform to the requirements of this section in order to be effective. A domestic relations order does not take effect until it is served on the System by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested. In the event that there is more than one domestic relations order, the order which is most recent in time and which has been served on the System will control.

A member’s or beneficiary’s rights in the Retirement System may be modified by a domestic relations order as provided in this section.

A domestic relations order shall contain all of the following elements:

the identity of the member or beneficiary and the alternate payee by full name, current address, and Social Security number;

the amount or percentage of the member’s or beneficiary’s benefits to be paid by the Board to the alternate payee and the date or dates upon which the calculation of payments is to be based;

the number of payments or time period in which payments are required to be made under the domestic relations order; and

each retirement plan to which the domestic relations order applies.

A domestic relations order shall not provide:

for a type or form of benefit, option, or payment not available to the affected member or beneficiary;

for an amount or duration of payment greater than that available to the affected member or beneficiary;

that payment of a retirement allowance commence before the member departs from service and commences to receive benefits;

withdrawal of the member’s contributions without the consent of the member and the alternate payee; or

any requirements that are contrary to the intent of this section.

A domestic relations order may provide for apportionment of post-retirement adjustments to the retirement allowance.

Payments to the alternate payee under a domestic relations order shall be limited to the life of the member or beneficiary.

An alternate payee’s rights and interests under this section shall not survive the alternate payee’s death and shall not be transferable by inheritance.

An alternate payee’s rights or interests acquired pursuant to this section are not subject to assignment, execution, garnishment, attachment, or other process. An alternate payee’s rights or interests may be modified only by a domestic relations order amending the domestic relations order that established the right or interest.

The Board, the System, its agents, and employees shall not be liable to any person for carrying out the terms and conditions of a domestic relations order.

The Board may adopt rules to implement this section.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 36

, § 10; amended

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238.

§ 5067.
Postretirement adjustments to retirement allowances.

For members, as of June 30 in each year, commencing June 30, 1987, a determination shall be made of the increase, to the nearest one-tenth of a percent of the Consumer Price Index for the preceding fiscal year. The retirement allowance of each beneficiary in receipt of an allowance for at least one year on the next following December 31 shall be increased by an amount equal to one-half of the percentage increase. The increase shall commence on the January 1 immediately following such December 31. The adjustment shall apply to members of the Group A, B, or D plans receiving an early retirement allowance only in the year following attainment of normal retirement age, provided the member has received benefits for at least 12 months as of December 31 of the year preceding any January adjustment. The maximum adjustment of any retirement allowance resulting from any such determination shall be two percent for Group A members and three percent for Group B, C, and D members, and no retirement allowance shall be reduced below the amount payable to the beneficiary without regard to the provisions of this section.

For purposes of this section, Consumer Price Index shall mean the Northeast Region Consumer Price Index for all urban consumers, designated as “CPI-U,” in the northeast region, as published by the U.S. Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics.

No adjustment shall be made pursuant to this section in a deferred vested allowance payable pursuant to subsection 5059(a) of this title prior to its commencement.

For all members of Group A and Group B, who have retired prior to July 1, 1987, there is hereby granted on July 1, 1989 a cost of living adjustment to each member’s retirement allowance equal to two percent for each year of retirement prior to July 1, 1987 but not to exceed a total adjustment greater than ten percent.

No adjustment shall be made pursuant to this section in January if the Consumer Price Index as of the previous June 30th is a negative rate.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 39

, § 9; amended

1989, No. 11

, § 9;

1991, No. 233

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

1999, No. 61

, § 5;

2005, No. 197

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

2009, No. 139

(Adj. Sess.), § 10a;

2011, No. 63

, § H.3.

§ 5068.
Election.

Subject to the provisions of subsections (b) and (c) of this section, all employees shall be members of Group A, unless an election to become a member of Group B, C, or D is made pursuant to this section or, in the case of Group B or C, unless a collective bargaining agreement negotiated pursuant to 21 V.S.A. chapter 22 so specifies.

On or before September 30 of any year, the legislative body of a municipality may designate groups of employees eligible to become members of Group B or C. Such designation may apply to all eligible employees or to one or more of the following groups of employees:

sworn police officers appointed under chapter 55 of this title or a comparable provision of a municipal charter;

firefighters and officers of fire departments appointed under chapter 57 of this title or a comparable provision of a municipal charter;

other groups of employees that have a similarity of interests, needs, and general conditions of employment, as determined by the legislative body.

On or before September 30 of any year, the legislative body of a municipality may designate groups of employees eligible to become members of Group D. The designation may apply to one or more of the following groups of employees:

sworn police officers appointed under chapter 55 of this title or a comparable provision of a municipal charter;

firefighters and officers of fire departments appointed under chapter 57 of this title or a comparable provision of a municipal charter;

emergency medical personnel as defined in

24 V.S.A. § 2651

.

On or before any December 31 following a designation under subsection (b) or (c) of this section, individual employees so choosing shall become members of Group B, C, or D effective the July 1 immediately following, and all employees subsequently hired into that designated group shall become members of the group designated. However, for employees making such an election on or after December 31, 1993, unless such an election shall be made on the December 31 immediately following the designation made pursuant to subsection (b) or (c) of this section, a member must complete three years of creditable service as a member of the group designated in subsection (b) or (c) of this section to be eligible to retire as a member of that group.

The designation by the legislative body or the municipality, as appropriate, an election to become members of Group B, C, or D, or entry into Group B or C pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement, shall be irrevocable and shall apply so long as the employee remains in the designated employee group, except that a designation and election to Group B may be superseded by similar actions allowing participation in Group C and that a designation and election to Group B or C may be superseded by similar actions allowing participation in Group D.

Upon written request from the legislative body, the Board may waive the requirements that the actions required in subsections (b), (c), and (d) of this section be completed by the dates specified, if it determines that all membership enrollment requirements can be completed in time for membership to be effective on July 1.

Any employer who is a member of Group C as of June 30, 1995 may revoke Group C membership during the period that begins on July 1, 1995 and ends on March 31, 1996. Any employee who is a member of Group C as of June 30, 1995 may revoke Group C membership during the period that begins on July 1, 1995 and ends on June 30, 1996. If no election is made during these periods, Group C will be the designated group. An election under this subsection is irrevocable.

Any employee may retain Group C membership regardless of the employer’s election.

An employee or employer who revokes Group C membership shall return to the group of membership just prior to becoming a Group C member, provided that an employee or employer who was a member of Group A prior to becoming a Group C member may elect to return to Group A or become a member of Group B, if offered by the employer. In the absence of a prior group, any group offered by the employer shall be the designated group.

Any employee who elects to revoke Group C membership under this subsection shall be entitled to a refund. The refund shall be an amount equal to the contributions made as a Group C member under subsection (b) of section 5064 of this title in excess of the contribution the member would have made had he or she not transferred to Group C, plus the accumulated interest.

The procedure for election under this subsection shall be established by the Board. The Board shall establish the date of election, and provide all members with at least 30-days’ advance notice of the election together with a general written explanation of the election and its consequences, including an individual comparison of projected benefits at no cost to the member.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 39

, § 10; amended

1991, No. 233

(Adj. Sess.), § 8, eff. May 28, 1992;

1995, No. 25

, § 4;

1999, No. 61

, § 6;

2005, No. 197

(Adj. Sess.), § 9;

2019, No. 25

, § 3, eff. May 16, 2019.

§ 5069.
Insurance.

The Board may enter into insurance arrangements to provide health and medical benefits for retired members and their dependents. The Board may enter into insurance arrangements to provide dental coverage for retired members and their dependents, provided the municipalities or the System has no legal obligation to pay any portion of the dental benefit premiums.

The Board may, to the extent that it may be funded as described in this subsection, establish an uninsured program for the reimbursement of certain health care costs of retired members and their dependents pursuant to the following:

Benefits under an uninsured program shall be funded by redirecting a portion of contributions from employers. Employer contributions shall only be so redirected to the extent that those contributions offset an existing actuarially determined surplus with respect to the actuarial cost method and funding adopted by the Board. The Board may establish a trust to hold and invest employer contributions and to pay the benefits and administrative expenses of the program. The benefits or administrative expenses of this program shall not be paid from the Annuity Fund, the Pension Fund, or the Expense Fund.

The Board shall have the discretion to determine the method for allocating the fund balance to retired members; provided, however, that the aggregate benefits payable under this program may not exceed the aggregate contributions made by employers and earnings, if any, on those contributions. Prior to July 1 of each year, the Board shall notify each retired member of the amount available for reimbursement over the succeeding 12 months and the procedures by which the retired member or dependent may request reimbursement.

Retired members and their dependents shall be required to provide substantiation of their health care expense claims to the extent required by the Internal Revenue Service for tax-favored treatment of their reimbursements. The Board may enter into an agreement with a third party administrator to process the expense claims of retired members and their dependents.

As an alternative to providing health care insurance, the Board, in its discretion, may assist retired members of the System with the cost of health care by authorizing payment of a health care stipend to retired members in an amount to be determined by the Board. In the event the Board determines to provide such a stipend, it shall annually review the stipend, in consultation with the actuary designated pursuant to subsection 5062(j) of this title, and determine whether to continue to provide the stipend and the amount to be paid. If authorized by the Board, a stipend shall be paid in 12 monthly installments commencing on July 1 of that year.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 233

(Adj. Sess.), § 9; amended

1999, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 15;

2005, No. 197

(Adj. Sess.), § 10;

2009, No. 24

, § 13.

§ 5070.
Defined contribution retirement plan.

The Board may approve a defined contribution retirement plan for one or more groups of members. The plan shall qualify as a defined contribution plan under the U.S. Internal Revenue Code, as amended. Participation in a defined contribution plan offered under this section shall be in lieu of participation in any other plan established under this title. The Board shall ensure that objective educational material be prepared and presented to the employees in order to enable them to make an informed decision, under the assumption that each participant is an unsophisticated investor.

The proper authority or officer responsible for making up each employer payroll shall certify to the Board the amounts deducted on each and every payroll for employees participating in the defined contribution plan, and each of those amounts shall be paid into the defined contribution fund and credited to the individual account of the member from whose compensation the deduction was made.

Employer reports and corresponding member contributions required by this subsection shall be provided by the due date established by the Board. An employer that provides reports or remits contributions, which are more than 30 days delinquent, may be assessed a delinquent reporting fee of one percent of the amount that should have been reported and remitted for each month, or prorated portion of a month, that the report or contributions are delinquent.

Employers shall provide accurate reports. An employer who provides an inaccurate report shall be responsible for correcting any deficiencies and shall reimburse the System for any costs incurred by the System as a result of inaccuracy.

In the event that an employer willfully files an inaccurate report, in addition to any other penalties provided by law, the employer shall pay the System an administrative penalty of up to 50 percent of the amount that was not accurately reported.

The System may enforce the provisions of this subsection in Washington Superior Court.

The Board may, in its discretion, waive part or all of a penalty assessment for good cause shown.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 53

, § 14; amended

2007, No. 13

, § 49.